Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.132

[Art. 15] Commanding officer's nonjudicial punishment—Suspension—Appeal.

(1) Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, limitations may be placed on the powers granted by this section with respect to the kind and amount of punishment authorized, the categories of commanding officers and warrant officers exercising command authorized to exercise those powers, the applicability of this section to an accused who demands trial by court-martial, and the kinds of courts-martial to which the case may be referred upon such a demand. However, except in the case of a member attached to or embarked in a vessel, punishment may not be imposed upon any member of the organized militia under this section if the member has, before the imposition of such punishment, demanded trial by court-martial in lieu of such punishment. Under similar regulations, rules may be prescribed with respect to the suspension of punishments authorized hereunder. If authorized by regulations of the governor, a commanding officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction or an officer of general rank in command may delegate powers under this section to a principal assistant.

(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, any commanding officer may, in addition to or in lieu of admonition or reprimand, impose one or more of the following disciplinary punishments for minor offenses without the intervention of a court-martial:

(a) Upon officers of his or her command:

(i) Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen consecutive duty or drill days;

(ii) If imposed by an officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction or an officer of general rank in command:

(A) Forfeiture of up to thirty days' pay, but not more than fifteen days' pay per month;

(B) Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen consecutive drill or duty days;

(C) Detention of up to forty-five days' pay, but not more than fifteen days' pay per month;

(b) Upon other personnel of his or her command:

(i) If imposed upon a person attached to or embarked in a vessel, confinement for not more than three consecutive days;

(ii) Forfeiture of not more than seven days' pay;

(iii) Reduction to the next inferior pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction;

(iv) Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties for not more than fourteen duty or drill days, which need not be consecutive, and for not more than two hours per day, holidays included;

(v) Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen consecutive days;

(vi) Detention of not more than fourteen days' pay;

(vii) If imposed by a commanding officer of the grade of major or above:

(A) The punishment authorized in subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section;

(B) Forfeiture of up to thirty days' pay, but not more than fifteen days' pay per month;

(C) Reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction, but an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-4 may not be reduced more than two pay grades;

(D) Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than fourteen drill or duty days, which need not be consecutive, and for not more than two hours per day, holidays included;

(E) Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen consecutive days;

(F) Detention of up to forty-five days' pay, but not more than fifteen days' pay per month.

Detention of pay shall be for a stated period of not more than one year but if the offender's term of service expires earlier, the detention shall terminate upon that expiration. Extra duties and restriction may not be combined to run consecutively in the maximum amount imposable for each. Whenever any such punishments are combined to run consecutively, there must be an apportionment. In addition, forfeiture of pay may not be combined with detention of pay without an apportionment.

(3) An officer in charge may impose upon enlisted members assigned to the unit of which the officer is in charge such of the punishment authorized under subsection (2)(b) of this section as the governor may specifically prescribe by regulation.

(4) The officer who imposes the punishment authorized in subsection (2) of this section, or a successor in command, may, at any time, suspend probationally any part or amount of the unexecuted punishment imposed and may suspend probationally a reduction in grade or a forfeiture imposed under subsection (2) of this section, whether or not executed. In addition, the officer may, at any time, remit or mitigate any part or amount of the unexecuted punishment imposed and may set aside in whole or in part the punishment, whether executed or unexecuted, and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected. The officer may also mitigate reduction in grade to forfeiture or detention of pay. When mitigating extra duties to restriction, the restriction shall not be longer than the number of hours of extra duty that may have been imposed. When mitigating reduction in grade to forfeiture or detention of pay, the amount of the forfeiture or detention shall not be greater than the amount that could have been imposed initially under this section by the officer who imposed the punishment mitigated.

(5) A person punished under this section who considers the punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority. The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided, but the person punished may in the meantime be required to undergo the punishment adjudged. The superior authority may exercise the same powers with respect to the punishment imposed as may be exercised under subsection (4) of this section by the officer who imposed the punishment. Before acting on an appeal from a punishment of:

(a) Forfeiture of more than seven days' pay;

(b) Reduction of one or more pay grades from the fourth or a higher pay grade;

(c) Extra duties for more than ten days;

(d) Restriction for more than ten days; or

(e) Detention of more than fourteen days' pay;

the authority who is to act on the appeal shall refer the case to a judge advocate for consideration and advice, and may so refer the case upon appeal from any punishment imposed under subsection (2) of this section.

(6) The imposition and enforcement of disciplinary punishment under this section for any act or omission is not a bar to trial by court-martial for a serious crime or offense growing out of the same act or omission, and not properly punishable under this section; but the fact that a disciplinary punishment has been enforced may be shown by the accused upon trial, and when so shown shall be considered in determining the measure of punishment to be adjudged in the event of a finding of guilty.

(7) The governor may by regulation prescribe the form of records to be kept of proceedings under this section and may also prescribe that certain categories of those proceedings shall be in writing.

[ 2009 c 378 s 9; 1991 c 43 s 5; 1989 c 48 s 15; 1963 c 220 s 15.]